Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-803
Sale; notice to owner; registered or certified mail; time of mailing.

The posting or mailing of either a registered or certified letter, with a return address marked thereon, addressed to the owner or owners at his, her, its, or their address, given at the time of the delivery of the article or articles to a person, firm, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation to render any of the services or labors as set out in sections 52-801 to 52-806, stating the time and place of sale, shall constitute notice under such sections. The notice shall be posted or mailed at least thirty days before the date of sale. The costs of posting or mailing the letter shall be added to the charges.

Laws 1943, c. 120, § 3, p. 417;

R.S.1943, § 52-803;

Laws 1957, c. 242, § 44, p. 855;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 311.